District of Columbia statutes.
35-122

Waiting room on platform authorized.

In lieu of the said substation and facilities maintained at the intersection of 7th Street and C Street Southwest, in the City of Washington, the Philadelphia, Baltimore and Washington Railroad Company is authorized to construct and maintain on the train platform an enclosed waiting room for passengers, with convenient means of ingress and egress leading from and to the street level below.

History

July 25, 1935, 49 Stat. 498, ch. 415, § 2

Section References

This section is referenced in § 35-121.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 44-105.
1973 Ed., § 44-105.